Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-6,308
Operating motorcycles on roadways laned for traffic; prohibited acts.

(1) A motorcycle shall be entitled to full use of a traffic lane of any highway, and no vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as to deprive any motorcycle of the full use of such lane, except that motorcycles may be operated two abreast in a single lane.

(2) The operator of a motorcycle shall not overtake and pass in the same lane occupied by a vehicle being overtaken.

(3) No person shall operate a motorcycle between lanes of traffic or between adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.

(4) Motorcycles shall not be operated more than two abreast in a single lane.

(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to peace officers in the performance of their official duties.

(6) No person who rides upon a motorcycle shall attach himself, herself, or the motorcycle to any other vehicle on a roadway.

(7) For purposes of this section, motorcycle does not include an autocycle.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 94;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-694;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 404;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 110.
April 12, 2018